Utah statutes.
13-22-21.   Appeal on behalf of individual.
(1)  If a charitable campaign consisting of exempt solicitations for the
relief of a named individual sustaining a life-threatening illness or injury,
as described in Subsection 13-22-8(1)(d), collects proceeds in excess of
$1,000, the organizer of the campaign shall give the division written notice
of the following:
(a)  the organizer's name and address;
(b)  the name, whereabouts, and present condition of the person for whose
relief the contributions are solicited including a letter from the person's
attending physician detailing the illness or injury;
(c)  the date the charitable campaign commenced; and
(d)  the purpose to which the collected contributions are to be applied.
(2)  Notice under Subsection (1) is due within ten days after commencing the
appeal or collecting in excess of $1,000, whichever is later.
(3)  If the organizer fails to file timely notice, the division shall inform
the organizer of the notice requirement and give the organizer ten additional
days as a grace period within which to file the notice.  If the organizer
fails to file the notice within the grace period, the division may issue a
cease and desist order against the organizer.
(4)  If, at any time, the division has reasonable cause to believe that the
organizer is perpetrating a fraud against the public, or in any other way
intends to profit from harming the public through the charitable campaign, it
shall issue a cease and desist order against the organizer.
